src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
тэ̄ӈкве+V:тэ̄ copula ;
а̄стлалыглаӈкве+V:а̄стлалыгл V_A "23_even_доканчивать" ;
айхатуӈкве+V:айхат V_U "13_even_захлебнуться" ;
акван-нэ̄гсала̄лыглаӈкве+V:акван-нэ̄гсала̄лыгл V_A "23_even_связывать//увязывать" ;
аниглахтуӈкве+V:аниглахт V_U "23_odd_целоваться" ;
аниглаӈкве+V:анигл V_A "23_even_целовать" ;
атыглаӈкве+V:атыгл V_A "23_even_отложить /приберечь/" ;
ва̄рапаӈкве+V:ва̄рап V_A "11_even_сделать /быстро/" ;
ва̄рыгла̄луӈкве+V:ва̄рыгла̄л V_U "13_odd_приготовлять /пищу/" ;
ваӈкырта̄лыглаӈкве+V:ваӈкырта̄лыгл V_A "23_even_зацеплять" ;
во̄ртхатуӈкве+V:во̄ртхат V_U "13_even_упереться" ;
восгасаӈкве+V:восгас V_A "15_even_шепнуть//прошептать" ;
вощкасахтуӈкве+V:вощкасахт V_U "23_odd_кинуться" ;
ка̄рвыльтаӈкве+V:ка̄рвыльт V_A "23_even_караулить" ;
кантмыгла̄луӈкве+V:кантмыгла̄л V_U "13_odd_сердиться /иногда/" ;
кон-ва̄ӈкуӈкве+V:кон-ва̄ӈк V_U "21_odd_выползти" ;
кон-ваӈкантаӈкве+V:кон-ваӈкант V_A "23_even_выползать " ;
кон-тотыгла̄луӈкве+V:кон-тотыгла̄л V_U "13_odd_выносить " ;
кон-ще̄лтумтаӈкве+V:кон-ще̄лтумт V_A "23_even_выбросить " ;
ла̄кква-лоньхата̄нтуӈкве+V:ла̄кква-лоньхата̄нт V_U "23_odd_разваливаться" ;
ла̄кква-рагатаӈкве+V:ла̄кква-рагат V_A "13_even_разлететься /омелких предметах/" ;
ла̄кква-тотыгла̄луӈкве+V:ла̄кква-тотыгла̄л V_U "13_odd_разводить /по разным местам/" ;
лап-а̄мараӈкве+V:лап-а̄мар V_A "11_even_затопить /водой/" ;
лап-ва̄рыгла̄луӈкве+V:лап-ва̄рыгла̄л V_U "13_odd_огораживать" ;
лап-рамхатуӈкве+V:лап-рамхат V_U "13_even_окопаться" ;
лап-хилантаӈкве+V:лап-хилант V_A "23_even_зарывать" ;
лаплахтуӈкве+V:лаплахт V_U "23_even_приподняться" ;
луйгуӈкве+V:луйг V_U "21_odd_щебетать" ;
лущитаӈкве+V:лущит V_A "13_even_служить /в армии/" ;
лятата̄нтуӈкве+V:лятата̄нт V_U "23_odd_потрескивать" ;
ма̄лтыпмаӈкве+V:ма̄лтыпм V_A "21_even_потеплеть" ;
мингала̄нтуӈкве+V:мингала̄нт V_U "23_odd_" ;
минмыгтаӈкве+V:минмыгт V_A "23_even_отправиться" ;
на̄ӈкыгла̄луӈкве+V:на̄ӈкыгла̄л V_U "13_odd_виднеться /иногда/" ;
намая̄лыглаӈкве+V:намая̄лыгл V_A "23_even_называть" ;
но̄х-лю̄люмта̄лыглаӈкве+V:но̄х-лю̄люмта̄лыгл V_A "23_even_вскакивать " ;
но̄х-масыгла̄луӈкве+V:но̄х-масыгла̄л V_U "13_odd_надевать" ;
но̄х-хаӈхыгтаӈкве+V:но̄х-хаӈхыгт V_A "23_even_забраться /вверх/" ;
номылмаптуӈкве+V:номылмапт V_U "23_odd_напомнить" ;
нэ̄руӈкве+V:нэ̄р V_U "11_odd_отталкиваться шестом" ;
ню̄нсалахтыглаӈкве+V:ню̄нсалахтыгл V_A "23_even_потянуться /в длину//высоту/" ;
нёланта̄нтуӈкве+V:нёланта̄нт V_U "23_odd_" ;
нёрыгтаӈкве+V:нёрыгт V_A "23_even_лить" ;
оигла̄луӈкве+V:оигла̄л V_U "13_odd_убегать" ;
олмыгта̄лыглаӈкве+V:олмыгта̄лыгл V_A "23_even_поселяться" ;
па̄г-патуӈкве+V:па̄г-пат V_U "13_odd_умереть" ;
па̄лыг-то̄ллантаӈкве+V:па̄лыг-то̄ллант V_A "23_even_разрываться /рваться/" ;
па̄ргуӈкве+V:па̄рг V_U "21_odd_фыркать" ;
патапаӈкве+V:патап V_A "11_even_оказаться" ;
паттала̄нтуӈкве+V:паттала̄нт V_U "23_odd_" ;
пе̄рыгла̄луӈкве+V:пе̄рыгла̄л V_U "13_odd_свивать//скручивать /верёвку/" ;
по̄илтта̄лыглаӈкве+V:по̄илтта̄лыгл V_A "23_even_" ;
по̄снхатуӈкве+V:по̄снхат V_U "13_even_метиться" ;
понсантаӈкве+V:понсант V_A "23_even_созревать" ;
порссытаптыгла̄луӈкве+V:порссытаптыгла̄л V_U "13_odd_засорять" ;
потырта̄лыглаӈкве+V:потырта̄лыгл V_A "23_even_рассказывать" ;
пулиг-са̄груӈкве+V:пулиг-са̄гр V_U "21_odd_сечь /рубить/" ;
пӯнсыгтаӈкве+V:пӯнсыгт V_A "23_even_распахнуть /раскрыть/" ;
ра̄пщуӈкве+V:ра̄пщ V_U "26_odd_моргать" ;
ро̄влаӈкве+V:ро̄вл V_A "23_even_выровнять " ;
ро̄ӈхуӈкве+V:ро̄ӈх V_U "21_odd_гудеть" ;
са̄суӈкве+V:са̄с V_U "15_odd_протечь /стать проницаемым снизу/" ;
са̄ялтахтыглаӈкве+V:са̄ялтахтыгл V_A "23_even_скрываться" ;
саӈхвуӈкве+V:саӈхв V_U "31_odd_лягать" ;
со̄па̄витаӈкве+V:со̄па̄вит V_A "13_odd_" ;!Check my аӈкве
суйтыгла̄луӈкве+V:суйтыгла̄л V_U "13_odd_раздаваться /о звуке/" ;
супыг-хӯрата̄лыглаӈкве+V:супыг-хӯрата̄лыгл V_A "23_even_обстригать" ;
та̄гиньтаптуӈкве+V:та̄гиньтапт V_U "23_odd_заполнить" ;
та̄гиньтаӈкве+V:та̄гиньт V_A "23_even_заполниться" ;
тагата̄лыглаӈкве+V:тагата̄лыгл V_A "23_even_вешать " ;
таглуӈкве+V:тагл V_U "23_odd_цепляться" ;
то̄варттахтуӈкве+V:то̄варттахт V_U "23_odd_" ;
то̄рамаптантаӈкве+V:то̄рамаптант V_A "23_even_потрясти /тряхнуть несколько раз/" ;
тув-а̄ӈкваталуӈкве+V:тув-а̄ӈкватал V_U "13_odd_заглянуть" ;
тув-ка̄ртантаӈкве+V:тув-ка̄ртант V_A "23_even_коченеть" ;
туигла̄луӈкве+V:туигла̄л V_U "13_odd_" ;
турманлаӈкве+V:турманл V_A "23_even_стемнеть" ;
тӯйтхатуӈкве+V:тӯйтхат V_U "13_even_укрыться /спрятаться/" ;
тӯщталаӈкве+V:тӯщтал V_A "13_even_ставить /вертикально/" ;
ха̄суӈкве+V:ха̄с V_U "15_odd_уметь" ;
халытаӈкве+V:халыт V_A "13_even_" ;
хасхатыгла̄луӈкве+V:хасхатыгла̄л V_U "13_even_расписываться" ;
хо̄иглаӈкве+V:хо̄игл V_A "23_even_заехать /по путй/" ;
холтыгла̄луӈкве+V:холтыгла̄л V_U "13_odd_истреблять" ;
хот-армалтаӈкве+V:хот-армалт V_A "23_even_отбирать /отнять в схватке/" ;
хот-воигла̄луӈкве+V:хот-воигла̄л V_U "13_odd_убирать /брать/" ;
хот-о̄щуӈкве+V:хот-о̄щ V_U "16_odd_уставиться" ;
хот-ойталаӈкве+V:хот-ойтал V_A "13_even_выпрячь " ;
хот-ро̄ӈхалтахтуӈкве+V:хот-ро̄ӈхалтахт V_U "23_odd_зареветь" ;
хот-сыстамтаӈкве+V:хот-сыстамт V_A "23_even_расчистить" ;
хот-хӯрата̄лыглаӈкве+V:хот-хӯрата̄лыгл V_A "23_even_обстригать" ;
хулюмта̄луӈкве+V:хулюмта̄л V_U "13_odd_проскользнуть" ;
хулюмта̄лыглаӈкве+V:хулюмта̄лыгл V_A "23_even_проскальзывать" ;
щалтапаӈкве+V:щалтап V_A "11_even_влезть /во что-л/" ;
щёлата̄лыглалуӈкве+V:щёлата̄лыглал V_U "13_odd_оживляться" ;
э̄лаль-са̄вмалтаӈкве+V:э̄лаль-са̄вмалт V_A "23_even_умножать//увеличивать" ;
юв-ма̄гумтаӈкве+V:юв-ма̄гумт V_A "23_even_всунуть " ;
юв-хайтыгла̄луӈкве+V:юв-хайтыгла̄л V_U "13_odd_вбегать " ;
яктантаӈкве+V:яктант V_A "23_even_" ;
ё̄рмуӈкве+V:ё̄рм V_U "21_odd_усилиться" ;
ёл-нэ̄гссала̄лыглаӈкве+V:ёл-нэ̄гссала̄лыгл V_A "23_even_привязывать" ;
ёл-торамтаӈкве+V:ёл-торамт V_A "23_even_успокоить" ;
ёл-тумщасуӈкве+V:ёл-тумщас V_U "15_even_выплеснуться" ;
ёрувлаӈкве+V:ёрувл V_A "23_even_забыть" ;
ӯмуӈкве+V:ӯм V_U "11_odd_черпать" ;
